Illinois, session 104th, HB4162.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Official Speaker of the House of Representatives Portrait Act. 6    Section 5. Official State portraits of the Speaker of the 7House of Representatives. The portraits of the Speakers of the 8House of Representatives of Illinois, painted or otherwise 9created as visual images, displayed in the State Capitol shall 10be the official State portraits of the Speakers of the House of 11Representatives of Illinois. 12    Section 10. State funding prohibited for felons. No 13portrait or other image of any person who has served as Speaker 14of the House of Representatives of Illinois and who has been 15convicted of a felony relating to or arising out of or in 16connection with his or her service as an elected official 17shall be financed or paid for by the State or any State entity 18or with State funds.